Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.070

Summons when petition filed—Service procedure—Hearing, when—Contempt upon failure to appear—Required notice regarding Indian children.

(1) Upon the filing of the petition, the petitioner shall issue a summons, one directed to the child, if the child is twelve or more years of age, and another to the parents, guardian, or custodian, and such other persons as appear to the court to be proper or necessary parties to the proceedings, requiring them to appear personally before the court at the time fixed to hear the petition. If the child is developmentally disabled and not living at home, the notice shall be given to the child's custodian as well as to the child's parent. The developmentally disabled child shall not be required to appear unless requested by the court. When the custodian is summoned, the parent or guardian or both shall also be served with a summons. The fact-finding hearing on the petition shall be held no later than seventy-five days after the filing of the petition, unless exceptional reasons for a continuance are found. The party requesting the continuance shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that exceptional circumstances exist. To ensure that the hearing on the petition occurs within the seventy-five day time limit, the court shall schedule and hear the matter on an expedited basis.

(2) A copy of the petition shall be attached to each summons.

(3) The summons shall advise the parties of the right to counsel. The summons shall also inform the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian of his or her right to appointed counsel, if indigent, and of the procedure to use to secure appointed counsel.

(4) The summons shall advise the parents that they may be held responsible for the support of the child if the child is placed in out-of-home care.

(5) The judge may endorse upon the summons an order directing any parent, guardian, or custodian having the custody or control of the child to bring the child to the hearing.

(6) If it appears from affidavit or sworn statement presented to the judge that there is probable cause for the issuance of a warrant of arrest or that the child needs to be taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050, the judge may endorse upon the summons an order that an officer serving the summons shall at once take the child into custody and take him or her to the place of shelter designated by the court.

(7) If the person summoned as provided in this section is subject to an order of the court pursuant to subsection (5) or (6) of this section, and if the person fails to abide by the order, he or she may be proceeded against as for contempt of court. The order endorsed upon the summons shall conspicuously display the following legend:

NOTICE:

VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER

IS SUBJECT TO PROCEEDING

FOR CONTEMPT OF COURT

PURSUANT TO RCW 13.34.070.

(8) If a party to be served with a summons can be found within the state, the summons shall be served upon the party personally as soon as possible following the filing of the petition, but in no case later than fifteen court days before the fact-finding hearing, or such time as set by the court. If the party is within the state and cannot be personally served, but the party's address is known or can with reasonable diligence be ascertained, the summons may be served upon the party by mailing a copy by certified mail as soon as possible following the filing of the petition, but in no case later than fifteen court days before the hearing, or such time as set by the court. If a party other than the child is without the state but can be found or the address is known, or can with reasonable diligence be ascertained, service of the summons may be made either by delivering a copy to the party personally or by mailing a copy thereof to the party by certified mail at least ten court days before the fact-finding hearing, or such time as set by the court.

(9) Service of summons may be made under the direction of the court by any person eighteen years of age or older who is not a party to the proceedings or by any law enforcement officer, probation counselor, or department employee.

(10) Whenever the court or the petitioning party in a proceeding under this chapter knows or has reason to know that an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040 is involved, the petitioning party shall promptly provide notice to the child's parent or Indian custodian and to the agent designated by the child's Indian tribe to receive such notices. Notice shall comply with RCW 13.38.070.

[ 2016 c 93 s 7; 2011 c 309 s 25; 2004 c 64 s 4; 2000 c 122 s 8; 1993 c 358 s 1; 1990 c 246 s 2; 1988 c 194 s 2; 1983 c 311 s 3; 1983 c 3 s 16; 1979 c 155 s 40; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 35; 1913 c 160 s 6; RRS s 1987-6. Formerly RCW 13.04.070.]

NOTES:

Severability—1990 c 246: See note following RCW 13.34.060.

Legislative finding—1983 c 311: See note following RCW 13.34.030.

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.